Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
PART 3 Inspection of Animals, Carcasses, Meat, and Meat Food Products; Adulteration and Misbranding

26-2-100.
Duties of inspectors.

The Commissioner shall appoint, from time to time, inspectors to make examination and inspection of all cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines, the inspection of which is provided for, and of all carcasses and parts thereof, and of all meats and meat food products thereof, and of the sanitary conditions of all establishments in which such meat and meat food products are prepared. Said inspectors shall refuse to stamp, mark, tag, or label any carcass or any part thereof, or meat food product therefrom, prepared in any establishment described in this chapter until the same shall have actually been inspected and found to be not adulterated. Said inspectors shall perform such other duties as are provided by this article and by the rules and regulations to be promulgated by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 13; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 15; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 11/SB 364.

26-2-100.1.
Examinations and inspections of nontraditional livestock carcasses, meats, and meat food products.

All examinations and inspections of nontraditional livestock carcasses and parts thereof, of nontraditional livestock meats and meat food products thereof, of sanitary conditions of all establishments in which nontraditional livestock meat and meat food products are prepared, and any other examination or inspection of nontraditional livestock and products thereof under or pursuant to this article shall be conducted by and through a voluntary inspection program with all costs thereof paid by the establishment slaughtering the nontraditional livestock or preparing such meat or meat food product, at rates established by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-100.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 16; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 12/SB 364.

26-2-101.
Inspections and examinations; administration in conjunction with Article 2 of this chapter.

All inspections and examinations made under this article shall be such and made in such manner as described in the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner, if not inconsistent with this article. This article may be administered in conjunction with the administration of Article 2 of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 13; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26.

26-2-102.
Inspection of animals prior to slaughter or preparation; examination and slaughtering of diseased animals; examination and inspection of method; right of Commissioner to deny or suspend inspections.

For the purpose of preventing the use in commerce of meat food products which are adulterated, the Commissioner shall cause to be made, by inspectors appointed for that purpose, an examination and inspection of all cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines before they shall be allowed to enter into any slaughtering, packing, meat-canning, rendering, or similar establishment in this state in which slaughtering and preparation of meat and meat food products of such animals are conducted for commerce.

All cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines found on such inspection to show symptoms of disease shall be set apart and slaughtered separately from all other cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines; and, when so slaughtered, the carcasses of said cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines shall be subject to a careful examination and inspection, all as provided by the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.

For the purpose of preventing the inhumane slaughtering of livestock, the Commissioner shall cause to be made, by inspectors appointed for that purpose, an examination and inspection of the method by which cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines are slaughtered and handled in connection with slaughter in the slaughtering establishments inspected under this article. The Commissioner may refuse to provide inspection to a new slaughtering establishment or may cause inspection to be suspended temporarily at a slaughtering establishment if the Commissioner finds that any cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines have been slaughtered or handled in connection with slaughter at such establishment by any method not in accordance with paragraph (2) of Code Section 26-2-110 and Code Section 26-2-110.1 until the establishment furnishes assurances satisfactory to the Commissioner that all slaughtering and handling in connection with slaughter of livestock shall be in accordance with such a method.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 3; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 657, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 17; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 6; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 13/SB 364.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Commissioner regarding prevention of spread of parasitic livestock diseases, §

4-4-60

et seq.

Regulation of business of livestock dealers generally, §

4-6-1

et seq.

26-2-103.
Post-mortem inspection and marking of carcasses and parts; disposition of condemned carcasses and parts; reinspection; removal of inspectors.

The Commissioner shall cause to be made, by inspectors appointed for that purpose, a post-mortem examination and inspection of the carcasses and parts thereof of all cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines, capable of use as human food, to be prepared at any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment in this state in which such articles are prepared for commerce.

The carcasses and parts thereof of all such animals found to be not adulterated shall be marked, stamped, tagged, or labeled as “Inspected and Passed”; and said inspectors shall label, mark, stamp, or tag as “Inspected and Condemned,” all carcasses and parts thereof of animals found to be adulterated; and all carcasses and parts thereof thus inspected and condemned shall be made unfit for human consumption by such establishment in the presence of an inspector; and the Commissioner may remove inspectors from any establishment which fails so to destroy any such condemned carcass or part thereof.

Inspectors, after the first inspection, shall, when they deem it necessary, reinspect said carcasses or parts thereof to determine whether since the first inspection the same have become adulterated. If any carcass or any part thereof shall, upon examination and inspection subsequent to the first examination and inspection, be found to be adulterated, it shall be made unfit for human consumption by such establishment in the presence of an inspector. The Commissioner may remove inspectors from any establishment which fails to destroy any such condemned carcass or part thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 18; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 7; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 14/SB 364.

26-2-104.
Inspection of carcasses, parts, meat, and meat products brought into or returned to slaughtering or packing establishments; limitations on entry of carcasses, parts, meat, and meat products.

Code Sections 26-2-102 and 26-2-103 shall apply to all carcasses or parts of carcasses of cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines, or the meat or meat products thereof, capable of use as human food, which may be brought into any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment where inspection under this part is maintained; and such examination and inspection shall be had before the carcasses or parts thereof shall be allowed to enter into any department wherein the same are to be treated and prepared for meat food products.

Code Sections 26-2-102 and 26-2-103 shall also apply to all such products which, after having been issued from any such slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment, shall be returned to the same or to any similar establishment where such inspection is maintained.

The Commissioner may limit the entry of carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat, and meat food products, and other materials into any establishment at which inspection under this part is maintained, under such conditions as he may prescribe, to assure that allowing the entry of such articles into such inspected establishments will be consistent with the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 5; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 19; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 15/SB 364.

26-2-105.
Inspection of meat food products where prepared; inspection markings; disposition of condemned meat food products; removal of inspectors.

The Commissioner shall cause to be made, by inspectors appointed for that purpose, an examination and inspection of all meat food products prepared in any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment where such articles are prepared for commerce.

For the purpose of any examination and inspection, said inspectors shall have access at all times, by day or night, whether the establishment be operated or not, to every part of said establishment.

The inspectors shall mark, stamp, tag, or label as “Inspected and Passed” all such products found to be not adulterated; and said inspectors shall label, mark, stamp, or tag as “Inspected and Condemned” all such products found adulterated; and all such condemned meat food products shall be made unfit for human consumption, as provided for in Code Section 26-2-103. The Commissioner may remove inspectors from any establishment which fails to destroy such condemned meat food products.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 6.

26-2-106.
Inspection of meat and meat food products in retail and other food service establishments; disposition of condemned meat; sale or display of noninspected meat or meat food products.

The Commissioner shall periodically require meat inspectors to inspect meat and meat products located within or held for sale or consumption in retail establishments and other food service establishments for the purpose of ascertaining whether the same has been inspected by a federal or state meat inspector. Any meat or meat product which does not appear to have been inspected previously by a federal or state meat inspector shall be labeled as unfit for sale and shall not be sold. Any meat found to be adulterated shall be made unfit for human consumption, as provided for in Code Section 26-2-103. For the purpose of any examination and inspection said inspectors shall have access to every part of said establishment during normal hours of operation or at such other times when meat processing operations are being conducted. Said inspectors shall be accompanied by the owner or his authorized agent.

It shall be unlawful for any retail establishment and other food service establishments to sell or display for sale any meat or meat food products which shall have been found by said inspectors to be adulterated or which have not been inspected by a federal or state meat inspector.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 56, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 426, § 3/HB 815.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted former subsection (c), which read: “It shall be the responsibility of the consumer protection division field force sanitarian to supervise and enforce this Code section.”

Cross references.

Promulgation of rules and regulations regarding sanitation standards for food service establishments, §

26-2-373

.

26-2-107.
Labeling of meat, meat food products, and carcasses; standards and definitions; use of false or misleading labels or containers.

When any meat or meat food product which has been inspected as provided for in Code Sections 26-2-102 through 26-2-106, and marked as “Inspected and Passed” shall be placed or packed in any can, pot, tin, canvas, or other receptacle or covering in any establishment where inspection under this article is maintained, the person, firm, or corporation preparing said product shall attach a label to said can, pot, tin, canvas, or other receptacle or covering, under supervision of an inspector, which label shall state that the contents thereof have been “Inspected and Passed” under this article. No inspection and examination of meat or meat food products deposited or enclosed in cans, tins, pots, canvas, or other receptacles or coverings in any establishment where inspection under this article is maintained shall be deemed to be complete until such meat or meat food products have been sealed or enclosed in said can, tin, pot, canvas, or other receptacle or covering under the supervision of an inspector.

All carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat, and meat food products inspected at any establishment under the authority of this article and found to be not adulterated shall at the time they leave the establishment bear, in distinctly legible form, directly thereon or on their containers, as the Commissioner may require, the information required under paragraph (13) of Code Section 26-2-62.

The Commissioner, whenever he determines such action is necessary for the protection of the public, may prescribe the styles and sizes of type to be used with respect to material required to be incorporated in labeling to avoid false or misleading labeling of any articles or animals subject to this part or to Part 4 of this article; definitions and standards of identity or composition for articles subject to this part and standards of fill of container for such articles not inconsistent with any such standards established under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act or under the Federal Meat Inspection Act; and there shall be consultation between the Commissioner and the secretary of agriculture of the United States prior to the issuance of such standards to avoid inconsistency between such standards and the federal standards.

No article subject to this part shall be sold or offered for sale by any person, firm, or corporation under any name or other marking or labeling which is false or misleading, or in any container of a misleading form or size. Established trade names and other marking and labeling and containers which are not false or misleading and which are approved by the Commissioner are permitted.

If the Commissioner has reason to believe that any marking or labeling or the size or form of any container in use or proposed for use with respect to any article subject to this part is false or misleading in any particular, he may direct that such use be withheld unless the marking, labeling, or container is modified in such manner as he may prescribe so that it will not be false or misleading. If the person, firm, or corporation using or proposing to use the marking, labeling, or container does not accept the determination of the Commissioner, such person, firm, or corporation may request a hearing; but the use of the marking, labeling, or container shall, if the Commissioner so directs, be withheld pending hearing and final determination by the Commissioner. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 7.

26-2-108.
Sanitary inspections of slaughter and packing establishments; sanitation regulations; labeling adulterated meat and meat food products.

The Commissioner shall cause to be made, by experts in sanitation or by other competent inspectors, such inspection as may be necessary to inform himself or herself about the sanitary conditions of all slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishments in which cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines are slaughtered and the meat and meat food products thereof are prepared for commerce. The Commissioner shall prescribe the rules and regulations of sanitation under which such establishments shall be maintained; and, where the sanitary conditions of any such establishment are such that the meat or meat food products are rendered adulterated, the Commissioner shall refuse to allow the meat or meat food products to be labeled, marked, stamped, or tagged as “Inspected and Passed.”

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 8; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 20; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 9; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 16/SB 364.

26-2-109.
Inspection of animals and food products thereof slaughtered and prepared at nighttime.

The Commissioner shall cause an examination and inspection of all cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines, and the food products thereof, slaughtered and prepared in the establishments described in this part. Such inspection shall be made during the nighttime as well as during the daytime, when the slaughtering of said cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, and other equines or the preparation of said food products is conducted during the nighttime.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 9; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 21; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 10; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 17/SB 364.

26-2-110.
Slaughter, preparation, sale, or transportation of animals, meat, or meat food products generally.

No person, firm, or corporation shall, with respect to any cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, or any carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat, or meat food products of any such animals:

Slaughter any such animals or prepare any such articles which are capable of use as human food, at any establishment preparing such articles for commerce except in compliance with this article;

Slaughter or handle in connection with such slaughter any such animals in any manner not declared to be humane under Code Section 26-2-110.1;

Sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in commerce:

Any such articles which:

Are capable of use as human food; and

Are adulterated or misbranded at the time of such sale, transportation, offer for sale or transportation, or receipt for transportation; or

Any articles required to be inspected under this part unless they have been so inspected and passed; or

With respect to any such articles which are capable of use as human food, do any act while they are being transported in commerce or held for sale after such transportation which is intended to cause or has the effect of causing such articles to be adulterated or misbranded.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 10; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 657, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 22; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 11; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 18/SB 364.

26-2-110.1.
Approved methods for handling and slaughtering of animals; designation by Commissioner of methods of handling and slaughtering.

For purposes of this article, the following methods of slaughtering and handling are declared to be humane:

In the case of cattle, calves, horses, mules, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, and other livestock, all animals are to be rendered insensible to pain by a single blow or gunshot or by an electrical, chemical, or other means which is rapid and effective before being shackled, hoisted, thrown, cast, or cut; or

By slaughtering and handling in connection with such slaughtering in accordance with the ritual requirements of the Jewish faith or any other religious faith that prescribes a method of slaughter whereby the animal suffers loss of consciousness by anemia of the brain caused by the simultaneous and instantaneous severance of the carotid arteries with a sharp instrument.

In addition to the methods prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section, the Commissioner may designate as humane any methods of slaughtering and handling which have been so designated by the United States secretary of agriculture on or before April 7, 1981, pursuant to United States Code Section 7-1904. The Commissioner is further authorized to designate as humane other methods of slaughtering and handling which have been demonstrated by research, investigation, and experimentation to be humane with reference to the speed and scope of slaughtering operations and with reference to other existing methods and then current scientific knowledge.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 657, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 23; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 12; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 19/SB 364.

26-2-111.
Labeling and preparation of carcasses, meat, and meat food products of equines.

No person, firm, or corporation shall sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in commerce, any carcasses of horses, mules, or other equines, or parts of such carcasses, or the meat or meat food products thereof unless they are plainly and conspicuously marked or labeled or otherwise identified as required by regulations promulgated by the Commissioner to show the kinds of animals from which they were derived. When required by the Commissioner with respect to establishments at which inspection is maintained under this part, such animals and their carcasses, parts thereof, meat, and meat food products shall be prepared in establishments separate from those in which cattle, sheep, swine, rabbits, or goats are slaughtered or their carcasses, parts thereof, meats, or meat food products are prepared.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 12; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1.

Cross references.

For further provisions regarding sale of horse meat, §

26-2-157

et seq.

26-2-112.
Inspection exceptions; labeling and handling of custom slaughtered and prepared meat or meat food products.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the provisions of this part requiring inspection of the slaughter of animals and the preparation of the carcasses, parts thereof, meat, and meat food products at establishments conducting such operations shall not apply to:

The slaughtering by any person of animals of his or her own raising and the preparation by him or her and transportation in commerce of the carcasses, parts thereof, meat, and meat food products of such animals exclusively for use by him or her and members of his or her household and his or her nonpaying guests and employees;

The custom slaughter by any person, firm, or corporation of cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, or goats delivered by the owner thereof for such slaughter and the preparation by such slaughterer and transportation in commerce of the carcasses, parts thereof, meat, and meat food products of such animals exclusively for use in the household of such owner by the owner and members of his or her household and his or her nonpaying guests and employees; nor to the custom preparation by any person, firm, or corporation of carcasses, parts thereof, meat, or meat food products derived from the slaughter by any person of cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, or goats of his or her own raising, or from game animals, delivered by the owner thereof for such custom preparation and transportation in commerce of such custom prepared articles, exclusively for use in the household of such owner by him or her and members of his or her household and his or her nonpaying guests and employees, provided that, in cases where such person, firm, or corporation engages in such custom operations at an establishment at which inspection under this article is maintained, the Commissioner may exempt from such inspection at such establishment any animals slaughtered or any meat or meat food products otherwise prepared on such custom basis. Custom operations at any establishment shall be exempt from inspection requirements as provided by this Code section only if the establishment complies with regulations which the Commissioner is authorized to promulgate to assure that any carcasses, parts thereof, meat, or meat food products, wherever handled on a custom basis, or any containers or packages containing such articles are separated at all times from carcasses, parts thereof, meat, or meat food products prepared for sale; that all such articles prepared on a custom basis or any containers or packages containing such articles are plainly marked “Not for Sale” immediately after being prepared and kept so identified until delivered to the owner; and that the establishment conducting the custom operation is maintained and operated in a sanitary manner; or

The slaughtering and processing of rabbits by any person who raises rabbits for slaughter and processing for sale at wholesale and retail in numbers not to exceed 2,500 rabbits per year.

The provisions of this article requiring inspection of the slaughter of animals and the preparation of carcasses, parts thereof, meat, and meat food products shall not apply to operations of types traditionally and usually conducted at retail stores and restaurants, when conducted at any retail store or restaurant or similar retail-type establishment for sale in normal retail quantities or service of such articles to consumers at such establishments.

The slaughter of animals and preparation of articles referred to in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be conducted in accordance with such sanitary conditions as the Commissioner may by regulations prescribe. Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, the Commissioner or his delegate is authorized to enter upon the premises of any establishment which is exempt from regular inspections under the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section and inspect such establishment and any facilities, carcasses, parts thereof, meat, meat food products, containers, and packaging to determine whether such establishment qualifies for exemption from regular inspections and is otherwise in compliance with the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Commissioner adopted pursuant thereto.

The adulteration and misbranding provisions of this part, other than the requirement of the inspection legend, shall apply to articles which are not required to be inspected under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 14; Ga. L. 1971, p. 57, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 849, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 26; Ga. L. 1989, p. 335, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 24; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 13; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 20/SB 364.

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 amendment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 253 (1989).

26-2-113.
Storage and handling regulations for carcasses, meat, and meat food products.

The Commissioner may by regulations prescribe conditions under which carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat, and meat food products of cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, capable of use as human food, shall be stored or otherwise handled by any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, freezing, storing, or transporting such articles whenever the Commissioner deems such action necessary to assure that such articles will not be adulterated or misbranded when delivered to the consumer.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 15; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 25; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 14; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 21/SB 364.

26-2-114.
Fraudulent practices.

No brand manufacturer, printer, or other person, firm, or corporation shall cast, print, lithograph, or otherwise make any device containing any official mark or simulation thereof, or any label bearing any such mark or simulation, or any form of official certificate or simulation thereof, except as authorized by the Commissioner.

No person, firm, or corporation shall:

Forge any official device, mark, or certificate;

Without authorization from the Commissioner, use any official device, mark, or certificate, or simulation thereof, or alter, detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

Contrary to the regulations promulgated by the Commissioner, fail to use or to detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

Knowingly possess, without promptly notifying the Commissioner or his representative, any official device, or any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official certificate, or any device or label, or any carcass of any animal, or part or product thereof, bearing any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official mark;

Knowingly make any false statement in any shipper’s certificate or other nonofficial or official certificate provided for in the regulations prescribed by the Commissioner; or

Knowingly represent that any article has been inspected and passed or exempted under this article when, in fact, it has, respectively, not been so inspected and passed or exempted.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 11.

26-2-115.
Use of “Georgia” in trademark, trade name, service mark, or advertisement.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, firm, or corporation to use the word “Georgia” in any trademark, trade name, service mark, or advertisement in connection with any meat or meat food product which is not equal to or better than U.S. grade “good.”

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 757, § 1.

Cross references.

Trademarks, service marks, and trade names generally, §

10-1-440

et seq.

26-2-116.
Applicability of part to federally inspected slaughtering and packing establishments.

The ante mortem, post-mortem, and sanitary inspection services provided for in this part are not required at any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment at which such services are furnished by the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to the Federal Meat Inspection Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 32.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Meat Inspection Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 601

et seq.